Illinois, session 104th, HB2688.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:5        (1) the State is experiencing a maternal health 6    crisis; and7        (2) access to out-of-hospital services is critical to 8    addressing the maternal health crisis. 9    Section 5. The Nurse Practice Act is amended by changing 10Sections 50-10 and 65-35 and by adding Sections 65-44 and 1165-70 as follows: 12    (225 ILCS 65/50-10)  (was 225 ILCS 65/5-10)13    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)14    Sec. 50-10. Definitions. Each of the following terms, when 15used in this Act, shall have the meaning ascribed to it in this 16Section, except where the context clearly indicates otherwise:17    "Academic year" means the customary annual schedule of 18courses at a college, university, or approved school, 19customarily regarded as the school year as distinguished from 20the calendar year.21    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 22by the Department in the applicant's or licensee's application   HB2688 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07342 AAS 17382 b1file or license file as maintained by the Department's 2licensure maintenance unit.3    "Advanced practice registered nurse" or "APRN" means a 4person who has met the qualifications for a (i) certified 5nurse midwife (CNM); (ii) certified nurse practitioner (CNP); 6(iii) certified registered nurse anesthetist (CRNA); or (iv) 7clinical nurse specialist (CNS) and has been licensed by the 8Department. All advanced practice registered nurses licensed 9and practicing in the State of Illinois shall use the title 10APRN and may use specialty credentials CNM, CNP, CRNA, or CNS 11after their name. All advanced practice registered nurses may 12only practice in accordance with national certification and 13this Act. 14    "Advisory Board" means the Illinois Nursing Workforce 15Center Advisory Board.16    "Approved program of professional nursing education" and 17"approved program of practical nursing education" are programs 18of professional or practical nursing, respectively, approved 19by the Department under the provisions of this Act.20    "Board" means the Board of Nursing appointed by the 21Secretary.22    "Center" means the Illinois Nursing Workforce Center.23    "Collaboration" means a process involving 2 or more health 24care professionals working together, each contributing one's 25respective area of expertise to provide more comprehensive 26patient care.  HB2688 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07342 AAS 17382 b1    "Competence" means an expected and measurable level of 2performance that integrates knowledge, skills, abilities, and 3judgment based on established scientific knowledge and 4expectations for nursing practice. 5    "Comprehensive nursing assessment" means the gathering of 6information about the patient's physiological, psychological, 7sociological, and spiritual status on an ongoing basis by a 8registered professional nurse and is the first step in 9implementing and guiding the nursing plan of care. 10    "Consultation" means the process whereby an advanced 11practice registered nurse seeks the advice or opinion of 12another health care professional.13    "Credentialed" means the process of assessing and 14validating the qualifications of a health care professional.15    "Dentist" means a person licensed to practice dentistry 16under the Illinois Dental Practice Act.17    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 18Professional Regulation.19    "Email address of record" means the designated email 20address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 21application file or the licensee's license file, as maintained 22by the Department's licensure maintenance unit.23    "Focused nursing assessment" means an appraisal of an 24individual's status and current situation, contributing to the 25comprehensive nursing assessment performed by the registered 26professional nurse or advanced practice registered nurse or   HB2688 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07342 AAS 17382 b1the assessment by the physician assistant, physician, dentist, 2podiatric physician, or other licensed health care 3professional, as determined by the Department, supporting 4ongoing data collection, and deciding who needs to be informed 5of the information and when to inform. 6    "Full practice authority" means the authority of an 7advanced practice registered nurse licensed in Illinois and 8certified as a nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist, 9or nurse midwife to practice without a written collaborative 10agreement and: 11        (1) to be fully accountable to patients for the 12    quality of advanced nursing care rendered; 13        (2) to be fully accountable for recognizing limits of 14    knowledge and experience and for planning for the 15    management of situations beyond the advanced practice 16    registered nurse's expertise; the full practice authority 17    for advanced practice registered nurses includes accepting 18    referrals from, consulting with, collaborating with, or 19    referring to other health care professionals as warranted 20    by the needs of the patient; and 21        (3) to possess the authority to prescribe medications, 22    including Schedule II through V controlled substances, as 23    provided in Section 65-43. 24    "Full practice authority-pending advanced practice 25registered nurse" means an advanced practice registered nurse 26licensed in Illinois and certified as a nurse practitioner,   HB2688 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07342 AAS 17382 b1clinical nurse specialist, or nurse midwife who has provided a 2notarized attestation of completion of at least 250 hours of 3continuing education or training in the advanced practice 4registered nurse's area of certification and at least 4,000 5hours of clinical experience after first attaining national 6certification and who has submitted an application to the 7Department to be granted full practice authority. 8    "Hospital affiliate" means a corporation, partnership, 9joint venture, limited liability company, or similar 10organization, other than a hospital, that is devoted primarily 11to the provision, management, or support of health care 12services and that directly or indirectly controls, is 13controlled by, or is under common control of the hospital. For 14the purposes of this definition, "control" means having at 15least an equal or a majority ownership or membership interest. 16A hospital affiliate shall be 100% owned or controlled by any 17combination of hospitals, their parent corporations, or 18physicians licensed to practice medicine in all its branches 19in Illinois. "Hospital affiliate" does not include a health 20maintenance organization regulated under the Health 21Maintenance Organization Act. 22    "Impaired nurse" means a nurse licensed under this Act who 23is unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety because 24of a physical or mental disability as evidenced by a written 25determination or written consent based on clinical evidence, 26including loss of motor skills, abuse of drugs or alcohol, or a   HB2688 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07342 AAS 17382 b1psychiatric disorder, of sufficient degree to diminish his or 2her ability to deliver competent patient care.3    "License-pending advanced practice registered nurse" means 4a registered professional nurse who has completed all 5requirements for licensure as an advanced practice registered 6nurse except the certification examination and has applied to 7take the next available certification exam and received a 8temporary permit from the Department.9    "License-pending registered nurse" means a person who has 10passed the Department-approved registered nurse licensure exam 11and has applied for a license from the Department. A 12license-pending registered nurse shall use the title "RN lic 13pend" on all documentation related to nursing practice.14    "Maternity care desert" means a county without any 15hospital, any birth center, or any licensed health care 16professional offering obstetric care. 17    "Nursing intervention" means any treatment based on 18clinical nursing judgment or knowledge that a nurse performs. 19An individual or entity shall not mandate that a registered 20professional nurse delegate nursing interventions if the 21registered professional nurse determines it is inappropriate 22to do so. A nurse shall not be subject to disciplinary or any 23other adverse action for refusing to delegate a nursing 24intervention based on patient safety. 25    "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine 26in all its branches under the Medical Practice Act of 1987.  HB2688 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 07342 AAS 17382 b1    "Podiatric physician" means a person licensed to practice 2podiatry under the Podiatric Medical Practice Act of 1987. 3    "Practical nurse" or "licensed practical nurse" means a 4person who is licensed as a practical nurse under this Act and 5practices practical nursing as defined in this Act. Only a 6practical nurse licensed under this Act is entitled to use the 7title "licensed practical nurse" and the abbreviation 8"L.P.N.".9    "Practical nursing" means the performance of nursing 10interventions requiring the nursing knowledge, judgment, and 11skill acquired by means of completion of an approved practical 12nursing education program. Practical nursing includes 13assisting in the nursing process under the guidance of a 14registered professional nurse or an advanced practice 15registered nurse. The practical nurse may work under the 16direction of a licensed physician, dentist, podiatric 17physician, or other health care professional determined by the 18Department.19    "Privileged" means the authorization granted by the 20governing body of a healthcare facility, agency, or 21organization to provide specific patient care services within 22well-defined limits, based on qualifications reviewed in the 23credentialing process. 24    "Registered Nurse" or "Registered Professional Nurse" 25means a person who is licensed as a professional nurse under 26this Act and practices nursing as defined in this Act. Only a   HB2688 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 07342 AAS 17382 b1registered nurse licensed under this Act is entitled to use 2the titles "registered nurse" and "registered professional 3nurse" and the abbreviation, "R.N.".4    "Registered professional nursing practice" means a 5scientific process founded on a professional body of knowledge 6that includes, but is not limited to, the protection, 7promotion, and optimization of health and abilities, 8prevention of illness and injury, development and 9implementation of the nursing plan of care, facilitation of 10nursing interventions to alleviate suffering, care 11coordination, and advocacy in the care of individuals, 12families, groups, communities, and populations. "Registered 13professional nursing practice" does not include the act of 14medical diagnosis or prescription of medical therapeutic or 15corrective measures.16    "Professional assistance program for nurses" means a 17professional assistance program that meets criteria 18established by the Board of Nursing and approved by the 19Secretary, which provides a non-disciplinary treatment 20approach for nurses licensed under this Act whose ability to 21practice is compromised by alcohol or chemical substance 22addiction.23    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 24Professional Regulation.25    "Unencumbered license" means a license issued in good 26standing.  HB2688 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 07342 AAS 17382 b1    "Written collaborative agreement" means a written 2agreement between an advanced practice registered nurse and a 3collaborating physician, dentist, or podiatric physician 4pursuant to Section 65-35. 5(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-686, eff. 1-1-25.) 6    (225 ILCS 65/65-35)  (was 225 ILCS 65/15-15)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)8    Sec. 65-35. Written collaborative agreements.9    (a) A written collaborative agreement is required for all 10advanced practice registered nurses engaged in clinical 11practice prior to meeting the requirements of Section 65-43, 12except for advanced practice registered nurses who are 13privileged to practice in a hospital, hospital affiliate, or 14ambulatory surgical treatment center.15    (a-5) If an advanced practice registered nurse engages in 16clinical practice outside of a hospital, hospital affiliate, 17or ambulatory surgical treatment center in which he or she is 18privileged to practice, the advanced practice registered nurse 19must have a written collaborative agreement, except as set 20forth in Section 65-43.21    (b) A written collaborative agreement shall describe the 22relationship of the advanced practice registered nurse with 23the collaborating physician and shall describe the categories 24of care, treatment, or procedures to be provided by the 25advanced practice registered nurse. A collaborative agreement   HB2688 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 07342 AAS 17382 b1with a podiatric physician must be in accordance with 2subsection (c-5) or (c-15) of this Section. A collaborative 3agreement with a dentist must be in accordance with subsection 4(c-10) of this Section. A collaborative agreement with a 5podiatric physician must be in accordance with subsection 6(c-5) of this Section. Collaboration does not require an 7employment relationship between the collaborating physician 8and the advanced practice registered nurse.9    The collaborative relationship under an agreement shall 10not be construed to require the personal presence of a 11collaborating physician at the place where services are 12rendered. Methods of communication shall be available for 13consultation with the collaborating physician in person or by 14telecommunications or electronic communications as set forth 15in the written agreement.16    (b-5) Absent an employment relationship, a written 17collaborative agreement may not (1) restrict the categories of 18patients of an advanced practice registered nurse within the 19scope of the advanced practice registered nurses training and 20experience, (2) limit third party payors or government health 21programs, such as the medical assistance program or Medicare 22with which the advanced practice registered nurse contracts, 23or (3) limit the geographic area or practice location of the 24advanced practice registered nurse in this State.25    (b-10) In the case of home birth services provided by a 26certified nurse midwife, a written collaborative agreement may   HB2688 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 07342 AAS 17382 b1permit a certified nurse midwife to provide home birth 2services within the scope of the certified nurse midwife's 3training and experience. A written collaborative agreement may 4not prohibit a certified nurse midwife from providing home 5birth services within the scope of the certified nurse 6midwife's training and experience. Where the collaborating 7physician does not provide home birth services, home birth 8services may be provided by a certified nurse midwife working 9under a written collaborative agreement with a collaborating 10physician when the services are provided in a federal primary 11care health professional shortage area with a Health 12Professional Shortage Area score greater than or equal to 12, 13as determined by the United States Department of Health and 14Human Services, or a maternity care desert. 15    (c) In the case of anesthesia services provided by a 16certified registered nurse anesthetist, an anesthesiologist, a 17physician, a dentist, or a podiatric physician must 18participate through discussion of and agreement with the 19anesthesia plan and remain physically present and available on 20the premises during the delivery of anesthesia services for 21diagnosis, consultation, and treatment of emergency medical 22conditions. 23    (c-5) A certified registered nurse anesthetist, who 24provides anesthesia services outside of a hospital or 25ambulatory surgical treatment center shall enter into a 26written collaborative agreement with an anesthesiologist or   HB2688 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 07342 AAS 17382 b1the physician licensed to practice medicine in all its 2branches or the podiatric physician performing the procedure. 3Outside of a hospital or ambulatory surgical treatment center, 4the certified registered nurse anesthetist may provide only 5those services that the collaborating podiatric physician is 6authorized to provide pursuant to the Podiatric Medical 7Practice Act of 1987 and rules adopted thereunder. A certified 8registered nurse anesthetist may select, order, and administer 9medication, including controlled substances, and apply 10appropriate medical devices for delivery of anesthesia 11services under the anesthesia plan agreed with by the 12anesthesiologist or the operating physician or operating 13podiatric physician.14    (c-10) A certified registered nurse anesthetist who 15provides anesthesia services in a dental office shall enter 16into a written collaborative agreement with an 17anesthesiologist or the physician licensed to practice 18medicine in all its branches or the operating dentist 19performing the procedure. The agreement shall describe the 20working relationship of the certified registered nurse 21anesthetist and dentist and shall authorize the categories of 22care, treatment, or procedures to be performed by the 23certified registered nurse anesthetist. In a collaborating 24dentist's office, the certified registered nurse anesthetist 25may only provide those services that the operating dentist 26with the appropriate permit is authorized to provide pursuant   HB2688 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 07342 AAS 17382 b1to the Illinois Dental Practice Act and rules adopted 2thereunder. For anesthesia services, an anesthesiologist, 3physician, or operating dentist shall participate through 4discussion of and agreement with the anesthesia plan and shall 5remain physically present and be available on the premises 6during the delivery of anesthesia services for diagnosis, 7consultation, and treatment of emergency medical conditions. A 8certified registered nurse anesthetist may select, order, and 9administer medication, including controlled substances, and 10apply appropriate medical devices for delivery of anesthesia 11services under the anesthesia plan agreed with by the 12operating dentist.13    (c-15) An advanced practice registered nurse who had a 14written collaborative agreement with a podiatric physician 15immediately before the effective date of Public Act 100-513 16may continue in that collaborative relationship or enter into 17a new written collaborative relationship with a podiatric 18physician under the requirements of this Section and Section 1965-40, as those Sections existed immediately before the 20amendment of those Sections by Public Act 100-513 with regard 21to a written collaborative agreement between an advanced 22practice registered nurse and a podiatric physician. 23    (d) A copy of the signed, written collaborative agreement 24must be available to the Department upon request from both the 25advanced practice registered nurse and the collaborating 26physician, dentist, or podiatric physician.   HB2688 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 07342 AAS 17382 b1    (e) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to limit the 2delegation of tasks or duties by a physician to a licensed 3practical nurse, a registered professional nurse, or other 4persons in accordance with Section 54.2 of the Medical 5Practice Act of 1987. Nothing in this Act shall be construed to 6limit the method of delegation that may be authorized by any 7means, including, but not limited to, oral, written, 8electronic, standing orders, protocols, guidelines, or verbal 9orders. 10    (e-5) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to authorize 11an advanced practice registered nurse to provide health care 12services required by law or rule to be performed by a 13physician. The scope of practice of an advanced practice 14registered nurse does not include operative surgery. Nothing 15in this Section shall be construed to preclude an advanced 16practice registered nurse from assisting in surgery. 17    (f) An advanced practice registered nurse shall inform 18each collaborating physician, dentist, or podiatric physician 19of all collaborative agreements he or she has signed and 20provide a copy of these to any collaborating physician, 21dentist, or podiatric physician upon request.22    (g) (Blank).23(Source: P.A. 100-513, eff. 1-1-18; 100-577, eff. 1-26-18; 24100-1096, eff. 8-26-18; 101-13, eff. 6-12-19.) 25    (225 ILCS 65/65-44 new)  HB2688 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 07342 AAS 17382 b1    Sec. 65-44. Certified nurse midwife out-of-hospital birth 2services. 3    (a) An advanced practice registered nurse certified as a 4nurse midwife may provide out-of-hospital birth services in a 5licensed birth center without a written collaborative 6agreement if the advanced practice registered nurse certified 7as a nurse midwife is granted clinical privileges for 8out-of-hospital birth services by the clinical director of the 9birth center.10    (b) An advanced practice registered nurse certified as a 11nurse midwife may provide out-of-hospital birth services in 12all practice settings consistent with national certification 13under a written collaborative agreement meeting the 14requirements of Section 65-30 of this Act with an advanced 15practice registered nurse with full practice authority if the 16services are provided in a federal primary care health 17professional shortage area with a Health Professional Shortage 18Area score greater than or equal to 12, as determined by the 19United States Department of Health and Human Services, or a 20maternity care desert.21    (c) The Department may adopt rules to administer this 22Section, including, but not limited to, rules that require the 23completion of forms and the payment of fees.24    (d) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to authorize an 25advanced practice registered nurse certified as a nurse 26midwife to provide health care services required by law or   HB2688 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 07342 AAS 17382 b1rule to be performed by a physician. 2    (225 ILCS 65/65-70 new)3    Sec. 65-70. Collaborating physician liability.4    (a) A physician shall not be liable for the acts or 5omissions of an advanced practice registered nurse solely on 6the basis of having signed a collaborative agreement, an 7order, a standing medical order, a standing delegation order, 8or another order or guideline authorizing the advanced 9practice registered nurse to perform certain acts, unless the 10physician has reason to believe that the advanced practice 11registered nurse lacked the competency to perform the act or 12acts or committed willful and wanton misconduct.13    (b) No physician shall be liable for any act or omission 14resulting from the provision of home birth services by a 15certified nurse midwife solely on the basis that the physician 16has entered a written collaborative agreement with the 17certified nurse midwife. A physician providing care shall be 18responsible for his or her own acts and omissions.